Utah statutes.
26-8a-252.   Department duties.

In connection with the statewide trauma system established in Section 26-8a-250, the department shall:

(1)  establish a statewide trauma system plan that:

(a)  identifies statewide trauma care needs, objectives, and priorities;

(b)  identifies the equipment, facilities, personnel training, and other things necessary to create and maintain a statewide trauma system; and

(c)  organizes and coordinates trauma care within defined geographic areas;

(2)  support the statewide trauma system by:

(a)  facilitating the coordination of prehospital, acute care, and rehabilitation services and providers through state regulation and oversight;

(b)  facilitating the ongoing evaluation and refinement of the statewide trauma system;

(c)  providing educational programs;

(d)  encouraging cooperation between community organizations, health care facilities, public health officials, emergency medical service providers, and rehabilitation facilities for the development of a statewide trauma system;

(e)  implementing a quality assurance program using information from the statewide trauma registry established pursuant to Section 26-8a-253;

(f)  establishing trauma center designation requirements in accordance with Section 26-8a-254; and

(g)  developing standards so that:

(i)  trauma centers are categorized according to their capability to provide care;

(ii)  trauma victims are triaged at the initial point of patient contact; and

(iii)  trauma patients are sent to appropriate health care facilities.



Enacted by Chapter 305, 2000 General Session

